Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB204.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the regulation of land and water use for flood control and storm water management purposes, imposing duties and conferring powers on the Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection, municipalities and counties, providing for enforcement, and making appropriations.Section 2. The definition of "department" in section 4 of the act is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.* * *Section 3. Section 9(a) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:Section 9. Review and approval by the department.(a) The department shall, in consultation with the Department of Community [Affairs] and Economic Development, review all watershed storm water plans and revisions or amendments thereto. It shall approve the plan if it determines:* * *Section 4. Section 14 heading and (a) introductory paragraph, (2) and (4) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 14. Powers and duties of the [Department of Environmental Resources] department.(a) The [Department of Environmental Resources] department shall have the power and its duty shall be to:* * *(2) Provide in cooperation with the Department of Community [Affairs] and Economic Development technical assistance to counties and municipalities in implementing this act.* * *(4) Review, in cooperation with the Department of Community [Affairs] and Economic Development, and approve all 20250SB0204PN0157 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 watershed plans and revisions thereto.* * *(c) The department shall o n an annual basis: (1) Conduct active water quality testing of surface waters within a watershed storm water plan in accordance with 40 CFR Pt. 136 (relating to guidelines establishing test procedures for the analysis of pollutants). (2) If the department does not have the resources to conduct the water quality testing required under this subsection, rely on the following to calculate the water quality standards of surface waters within a watershed storm water plan:(i) Water quality testing from the county conservation district, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Pennsylvania Game Commission, an institution of higher education that receives State funding or a private laboratory accredited by the department to perform water quality testing.(ii) If the department has not received water quality testing specified under subparagraph (i), a water quality testing model.(3) Grant a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit waiver to a small municipal separate storm sewer system that is in compliance with the criteria specified under 40 CFR 122.32(d) or (e) (relating to as an operator of a small MS4, am I regulated under the NPDES storm water program?).Section 5. Section 17(a) introductory paragraph and (c) of the act are amended to read:20250SB0204PN0157 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 17. Grants and reimbursements to municipalities and counties.(a) The [Department of Environmental Resources] department is authorized to administer grants to municipalities and counties to assist or reimburse them for costs in preparing official storm water management plans and actual administrative and enforcement and implementation costs and revisions to official plans for storm water management required by this act. Grants and reimbursements shall be made from and to the extent of funds appropriated by the General Assembly for such purposes, and shall be made in accordance to rules and regulations adopted by the Environmental Quality Board.* * *(c) If, in any fiscal year, appropriations are insufficient to cover the costs or grants and reimbursement to all municipalities and counties eligible for such grants and reimbursements in that fiscal year, the [Department of Environmental Resource] department shall report such fact to the General Assembly and shall request appropriation of funds necessary to provide the grants authorized in this section. If such a deficiency appropriation is not enacted, any municipality or county which has not received the full amount of the grant for which it is eligible under this section shall be as a first priority reimbursed from appropriations made in the next successive fiscal year.Section 6. Section 18 of the act is repealed:[Section 18. Appropriations.The sum of $500,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 1978, and ending June 30, 1979, to the Department of 20250SB0204PN0157 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Environmental Resources for the purposes of administrative and general expenses in implementing the provisions of this act.]Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0204PN0157 - 5 - 123